Hawaii statutes.
§342G-119 Redemption center reporting. The
department shall pay certified redemption centers handling fees and refund
values as described in section 342G-117, based on collection reports submitted
by the redemption centers. All redemption centers shall submit to the
department the following information on forms prescribed by the department,
which information shall include at a minimum:

(1) The number or weight of deposit beverage
containers of each material type accepted at the redemption center for the
reporting period;

(2) The amount of refunds paid out by material type;

(3) The number or weight of deposit beverage
containers of each material type transported out-of-state or to a permitted
recycling facility; and

(4) Copies of out-of-state transport and weight
receipts or acceptance receipts from permitted recycling facilities. If the
redemption center and the recycling facility are the same entity, copies of
out-of-state transport and weight receipts, or documentation of end use
accepted by the department, shall also be included.

The requests for payment shall be no less than two
times per month. [L 2002, c 176, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 241, §11; am L 2005, c
227, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next